Utah statutes.
32B-9-404.   Local authority's power to issue temporary beer event permit.

(1)  A local authority may issue, suspend, and revoke a temporary permit to sell, offer for sale, or furnish beer for on-premise consumption at an event, except that the local authority may not issue a temporary permit if the event lasts longer than 30 days.

(2)  Suspension or revocation of a temporary beer event permit issued under Section 32B-9-403 or a temporary permit issued by a local authority under this section prohibits the temporary beer event permittee who has a permit suspended or revoked by either the commission or local authority from continuing to operate under the other state or local permit.

